Louisiana, session 2026, HB350.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:1977.1 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1977.1. École Pointe-au-Chien; creation; location; governance
There is hereby created École Pointe-au-Chien, a public French immersion
school for students in grades prekindergarten through four. eight. The school shall
be located in Terrebonne Parish. The school shall be independent of the control of
the state superintendent of education and of all local and state education boards
except its board of directors.
Section 2.(A) The provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective when
an Act of the Louisiana Legislature containing a specific appropriation of monies for the
implementation of the provisions of this Act becomes effective.
(B) The provisions of this Section shall become effective upon signature by the
governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become
law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the
Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the
legislature, the provisions of this Section shall become effective on the day following such
approval.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1061 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 350